Missouri, session 2026, SB1608.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 135, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 135.463, to read as
follows:
135.463. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms shall mean:
(1) "Department", the Missouri department of public
safety;
(2) "Eligible entity", a not-for-profit organization
that operates a youth police initiative in an urban area in
this state;
(3) "State tax liability", any liability incurred by
an eligible entity pursuant to the provisions of chapter 143
or chapter 148, exclusive of the provisions relating to the
withholding of tax as provided for in sections 143.191 to
143.265 and related provisions;
(4) "Tax credit", a credit against the tax otherwise
due under chapter 143 or chapter 148, excluding withholding
tax imposed under sections 143.191 to 143.265;
(5) "Taxpayer", any individual, partnership, or
corporation as described under section 143.441 or 143.471

SB 1608 2
that is subject to the tax imposed under chapter 143,
excluding withholding tax imposed under sections 143.191 to
143.265;
(6) "Urban area", an urbanized area as defined by the
United States Census Bureau;
(7) "Youth police initiative", a program conducted by
an eligible entity for the purpose of engaging at-risk youth
and local police officers in activities and conversation to
build trust and break down stereotypes between youth and
police.
2. For all tax years beginning on or after January 1,
2026, a taxpayer shall be authorized to claim a tax credit
against the taxpayer's state tax liability in an amount
equal to one hundred percent of any contribution made to an
eligible entity for the purpose of funding a youth police
initiative in an urban area in this state.
3. (1) Tax credits authorized pursuant to this
section shall not be refundable, but may be carried forward
for five subsequent tax years or until the full tax credit
is redeemed, whichever occurs first.
(2) Tax credits authorized pursuant to this section
may be transferred, sold, or assigned.
(3) The total amount of tax credits that may be
authorized pursuant to this section shall not exceed five
hundred thousand dollars in any tax year.
4. (1) The department shall maintain a list of all
eligible entities to which a taxpayer may make a
contribution that is eligible for a tax credit pursuant to
this section. Such list shall be updated at least annually
and published on the department's website.
(2) In order to redeem a tax credit pursuant to this
section, a taxpayer shall submit evidence of a contribution

SB 1608 3
to an eligible entity to the department on forms to be
promulgated by the department. Such form shall include, but
not be limited to:
(a) The taxpayer's name;
(b) The name of the eligible entity to which a
contribution was made; and
(c) Documentation provided to the taxpayer by an
eligible entity evidencing the amount of the contribution
made to such eligible entity.
5. The department may promulgate rules to implement
the provisions of this section. Any rule or portion of a
rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
created under the authority delegated in this section shall
become effective only if it complies with and is subject to
all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are
nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay
the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are
subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
6. Pursuant to section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset
act:
(1) The program authorized pursuant to this section
shall automatically sunset six years after the effective
date of this section unless reauthorized by an act of the
general assembly;
(2) This section shall terminate on September first of
the calendar year immediately following the calendar year in
which the program authorized pursuant to this section is
sunset; and

SB 1608 4
(3) The provisions of this subsection shall not be
construed to impair or impede the state's fulfillment of any
obligations, including the authorization, issuance, or
redemption of tax credits, incurred pursuant to this section
prior to the date the program authorized pursuant to this
section is sunset.
✓